Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
145

REGULATION
OF FARM PRODUCE

Part I. Regulation of Dealers

Section

145-1 Definitions

145-2 Licenses

145-3 Records

145-4 Bonding of commission merchant and broker

145-5 Reports of consignment sales

145-6 Remittances

145-7 Credit for loss or dumping

145-8 Duty of department

145-9 Complaints and investigations

145-10 Administrative penalties

145-11 Nuisance may be enjoined, abated

145-12 Misdemeanor

145-13 Remedies and penalties not exclusive

145-14 Disposition of fees and charges

145-15 Rules and regulations

Part II. Ownership and Movement of
Agricultural

Commodities

145-21 Definitions

145-22 Agricultural commodities; ownership and
movement

certification

145-23 Lack of proof of ownership as a violation

145-24 Authorization to inspect

145-25 Enforcement; criminal penalties

145-26 Repealed

145-27 Authorization to seize and hold
commodities;

disposition

145-28 Repealed

Note

Chapter heading
amended by L 1999, c 186, §3.

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next